Missouri, session 2026, HB3353.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 590, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 590.1095, to read as follows:
590.1095. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Facial covering", any opaque mask, garment, helmet, headgear, or other
item that conceals or obscures the facial identity of an individual including, but not
limited to, a balaclava, tactical mask, gaiter, ski mask, and any similar type of facial
covering or face-shielding item. A facial covering does not include any of the following:
(a) A translucent face shield or clear mask that does not conceal or obscure the
wearer's facial identity;
(b) An N95 medical mask or surgical mask worn to protect against transmission
of disease or infection, or any other mask, helmet, or device including, but not limited to,
air-purifying respirators, full or half masks, or self-contained breathing apparatus
necessary to protect against exposure to any toxin, gas, smoke, inclement weather, or
any other hazardous or harmful environmental condition;
(c) A mask, helmet, or device including, but not limited to, a self-contained
breathing apparatus, necessary for underwater use;
(d) A motorcycle helmet when worn by an agent utilizing a motorcycle or other
vehicle that requires a helmet for safe operation while in the performance of their
duties; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3353 2
(e) Eyewear necessary to protect from the use of retinal weapons including, but
not limited to, lasers;
(2) "Law enforcement officer", any peace officer licensed under this chapter and
any federal law enforcement agent including, but not limited to, agents performing
Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) operations in this state.
2. Any law enforcement officer performing official duties in the state shall visibly
display identification that includes the officer's name, rank, and badge number. Such
officers shall not wear facial coverings that conceal or obscure their facial identity in the
performance of official duties, except as expressly authorized in this section.
3. This section shall not apply to law enforcement officers who are:
(1) Performing their duties as undercover operatives during an active
undercover operation or as needed to protect their identity following the conclusion
of an undercover operation;
(2) Assigned to a Special Response Team (SRT) while actively performing their
SRT responsibilities;
(3) Assigned to a Special Weapons And Tactic (SWAT) unit while actively
performing their SWAT responsibilities;
(4) Providing emergency response wherein exigent circumstances prevent the
officer from identifying himself or herself; and
(5) Performing duties wherein the officer cannot reasonably identify himself or
herself due to public safety concerns.
4. A willful and knowing violation of this section is punishable as a class A
misdemeanor.
✔